Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Part 8

Qualifications and Registration — Landscape Architects

62-2-801. Qualifications for registration.

In addition to the successful completion of examination acceptable to the board, the following shall be considered as minimum evidence satisfactory to the board that an applicant is qualified for registration as a landscape architect: an applicant who is a graduate of a school of landscape architecture where the professional degree curriculum has been accredited and who has completed three (3) years of practical experience in landscape architectural work satisfactory to the board, of which no more than one (1) year of landscape architectural practical training and school may be concurrent.

Acts 1988, ch. 990, § 22.

Cross-References. Occupation tax on landscape architects, title 67, ch. 4, part 17.

62-2-802. Accredited degree.

An accredited degree in landscape architecture shall be one that was accredited by the Landscape Architectural Accreditation Board (L.A.A.B.) at the time of graduation, or graduation was not more than two (2) academic years prior to accreditation.

Acts 1988, ch. 990, § 22.

62-2-803. Practical experience.

For the purpose of evaluating “practical experience in landscape architectural work,” the board may utilize criteria and standards published by the Council of Landscape Architectural Registration Boards (C.L.A.R.B.).

However, every applicant shall have not less than two (2) years of practical experience in an office of a practicing registered landscape architect.

To receive credit for practical training time, an applicant must be employed by the same employer for a period of no less than four (4) consecutive calendar months. The work month is considered to be one hundred forty (140) hours.

Experience acquired while employed by a registered landscape architect practicing as an individual will be credited as practical training only when acquired under the supervision of the practicing landscape architect in the course of the regular practice. Practice as a principal after proper landscape architectural registration by other jurisdictions may be accepted by the board as fulfilling the required experience in the office of a registered practicing landscape architect.

Experience acquired while employed by a partnership or corporation engaging in the practice of landscape architecture will be credited as practical training only when acquired under the supervision of the partner or partners or the officer or officers who shall be the registered landscape architect or registered landscape architects exercising professional and supervisory control over the particular landscape architectural services rendered by the partnership or corporation.

Practical experience as approved by the board and obtained while working in the United States government, public or private service agencies covering the field of education, research, and in the service of such agencies as redevelopment authorities, Peace Corps, VISTA, HUD, other United States government and armed forces agencies, multiplied by a factor of seventy-five hundredths (.75) may be considered as “practical experience” in landscape architectural work.

Notwithstanding any provision in this section, the board may refuse to credit as practical training experience acquired while employed by an individual or by any type of organization having any interest in any project or building prejudicial to or in conflict with the individual's or organization's professional interest therein.

Acts 1988, ch. 990, § 22.

62-2-804. Examination — Administration, grading, credit, retakes, applications to take examination, fees and refunds.

The written examination for candidates who are eligible for registration under § 62-2-801 may be the current landscape architecture registration examination prepared by the Council of Landscape Architectural Registration Boards (C.L.A.R.B.), as accepted by the board.

The board shall be responsible for administering and grading the examinations.

Candidates will retain credit for any parts of the examination passed and shall be permitted to have unlimited retakes of any parts of the examination failed.

The deadline date for receipt of applications for examination shall be at the discretion of the board. Each applicant eligible for written examination shall be notified of the dates set for each part of the examination, where it shall be held, and the instruments and materials the applicant shall provide.

The initial application fee shall entitle the candidate to one (1) examination of the prescribed number of parts. An additional fee shall be required for the retaking and examination or parts thereof. No refunds will be made.

Acts 1988, ch. 990, § 22.

62-2-805. Transfer privileges.

Upon proper application, the board may administer any part of the Council of Landscape Architectural Registration Board's examinations for candidates who have commenced the series of examinations in another state. Each such application shall be accompanied by an administration fee and endorsement by the landscape architectural registration board of original application. Separate applications as described in § 62-2-804 shall be filed for each year's examination.

Upon proper application and meeting the qualifications outlined in § 62-2-801, the board will credit to a candidate any of the prescribed parts of the Council of Landscape Architectural Registration Board's examinations successfully passed and properly attested to by another state or possession. The candidate may then take the remaining examination parts as set forth herein and, if successfully completed under this jurisdiction, may be registered by the board. The board will extend transfer privileges only once to each applicant and shall accept transfer of grades only from the state of original application.

Acts 1988, ch. 990, § 22.

62-2-806. Furnishing of examination results to other states.

When requested to do so, the board may allow candidates who have commenced examinations in Tennessee as outlined under § 62-2-804(a) to finish taking parts of these examinations in any other state; provided, that the other state approved this procedure and has established a method of accomplishing it.

The board shall upon proper application forward the grades achieved by a candidate in the various sections of the examination given under its jurisdiction to other duly constituted landscape architectural registration boards for their use in evaluating and utilizing the results in registering the individual within their jurisdiction. The request for transfer shall include a statement of concurrence by the other board and a description of the information it will require. The candidate shall state the applicant's need for requesting transfer and pay a fee established by the board. The transfer shall terminate the candidate's current application to this board for registration.

Acts 1988, ch. 990, § 22.

62-2-807. Records of examinations.

Whether conducted in this state or another state, all records of the examinations shall be returned to the state board of registration of landscape architects where the series of examinations were commenced, for recording and licensure when successfully completed.

After the written examination marks are properly recorded in the permanent record book, all examination books and papers over two (2) years old may be destroyed.

Acts 1988, ch. 990, § 22.